Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2022


(63 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1-731.4), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 1-731.4. A. As used in this section:


1. The terms “abortion” and “unborn child” shall have the same


meaning as provided by Section 1-730 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title; and


2. “Medical emergency” means a condition which cannot be


remedied by delivery of the child in which an abortion is necessary


to preserve the life of a pregnant woman whose life is endangered by


a physical disorder, physical illness or physical injury including a



Req. No. 2667 Page 1


life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the


pregnancy itself.


B. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person


shall not purposely perform or attempt to perform an abortion except


to save the life of a pregnant woman in a medical emergency.


2. A person convicted of performing or attempting to perform an


abortion shall be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine not to


exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or by confinement


in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not to


exceed ten (10) years, or by such fine and imprisonment.


3. This section does not:


a. authorize the charging or conviction of a woman with


any criminal offense in the death of her own unborn


child, or


b. prohibit the sale, use, prescription or administration


of a contraceptive measure, drug or chemical if the


contraceptive measure, drug or chemical is


administered before the time when a pregnancy could be


determined through conventional medical testing and if


the contraceptive measure, drug or chemical is sold,


used, prescribed or administered in accordance with


manufacturer instructions.


4. It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this


section if a licensed physician provides medical treatment to a

Req. No. 2667 Page 2


pregnant woman which results in the accidental or unintentional


injury or death to the unborn child.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2667 DC 1/15/2026 9:50:49 AM

































Req. No. 2667 Page 3